Oklahoma, session 2026, SB82.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


Each chamber of the Legislature shall require, every two (2)


years, four (4) hours total of mandatory training sessions for its


members, which shall be presented by the Ethics Commission and shall


emphasize the rules of the Ethics Commission. A form issued by the


Ethics Commission to each member shall be signed and returned by the


member to the member’s chamber of the Legislature attesting to the


completion of the training. The members of the Senate shall report


to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate. The members of the


House of Representatives shall report to the Speaker of the House of


Representatives. The monitoring and enforcement of this provision

Req. No. 222 Page 1


shall be determined by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and


the Speaker of the House of Representatives for their respective


delegations.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-222 TEK 1/19/2025 5:44:04 AM





































Req. No. 222 Page 2